Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 1, chapter 33, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  (1) As used in this section,  “foster child student” means a student enrolled in middle
school or high school who is a foster child because the student is:
(a) In the care and custody of the Department of Human Services pursuant to the provisions  of
ORS chapter 418 or 419B and is placed in substitute care; or
(b) A ward, as defined in  ORS 419A.004, who remains in the legal custody of the ward’s parent
or who is in the care and custody of the Department  of Human Services but who is residing with
the ward’s parent.
(2)(a) The Department of Education shall establish and administer  a pilot program to provide
support for foster child students to improve the educational outcomes of foster child students.
(b) Under the pilot program, the Department of Education  shall  provide grants to [ public
schools in this state ] school districts for distribution to any of the middle schools or high
schools of the school district  to improve the educational outcomes of foster child students  by ad-
dressing:
(A) The disparities experienced by foster child students in indicators of academic success;
(B) The historical practices leading to disproportionate outcomes for foster child students; and
(C) The educational needs of foster child students.
(c) [ Schools] School districts  participating in the pilot program must ensure that foster child
students are provided access to an individual who will:
(A) Serve as an educational advocate for a foster child student; and
(B) Provide guidance for and support to a foster child student for educational purposes.
(3) The Department of Education shall use moneys in the Statewide  Education Initiatives Ac-
count to provide funding for the pilot program.  The pilot program shall be considered a statewide
education plan for purposes of ORS 327.254.
(4) The Department of Education shall select three [ public middle or high schools  in this state ]
school districts  to  participate in the pilot program. The school districts shall distribute moneys
received under this section to any of the middle schools or high  schools of the school district
for the  purpose of the pilot program.  The department shall focus on geographically diverse re-
gions when selecting [ schools] school districts  to participate in the pilot program.
(5) The Department of Education shall submit reports concerning the pilot program to the in-
terim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to education as follows:
Enrolled House Bill 3449 (HB 3449-A) Page 1
(a) The first report  must be submitted no later than September 15, 2025, and must summarize
progress on the development and administration of the pilot program.
(b) The second report must be submitted no later than September 15, 2027, and:
(A) Must provide a summary of the pilot program, including any  changes in the educational
outcomes of foster child students who participated in the pilot program; and
(B) May provide recommendations for  a statewide education plan related to foster child stu-
dents.
(6) The State Board of Education may adopt any rules necessary for the administration  of this
section.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to section 1, chapter  33, Oregon Laws 2024, by section 1
of this 2025 Act, apply  to grants awarded prior to, on or after the effective date of this 2025
Act. Any grants awarded to a school prior to the effective date of  this 2025 Act may be dis-
tributed to other  schools in the school district in a manner consistent with section 1, chapter
33, Oregon Laws 2024.
SECTION 3.  Section 3, chapter 33, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  Section 1 [ of this 2024 Act ], chapter 33, Oregon  Laws 2024, as amended by section
1 of this 2025 Act,  is repealed on [ June 30, 2027 ] January 2, 2028 .
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House April 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3449 (HB 3449-A) Page 2